Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 81.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-181
Filings required for domestication;
effective date.

(ULLCA
1012) (a) After a plan of domestication is approved, a domesticating company
shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of domestication,
which must include:

(1) a statement, as the
case may be, that the company has been domesticated from or into another jurisdiction;

(2) the name of the domesticating
company and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(3) the name of the domesticated
company and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(4) the date the domestication
is effective under the governing statute of the domesticated company;

(5) if the domesticating
company was a limited liability company, a statement that the domestication
was approved as required by the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company
Act; and

(6)
if the domesticating company was a foreign limited liability company, a statement
that the domestication was approved as required by the governing statute of
the other jurisdiction.

(b)
A domestication becomes effective:

(1) when the certificate of organization takes effect,
if the domesticated company is a limited liability company; and

(2) according to the
governing statute of the domesticated company, if the domesticated organization
is a foreign limited liability company.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 81.